Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Masc_BackVowel.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 
LEXICON Root
NounMascBackVowelStem;

LEXICON NounMascBackVowel

+N+RT: #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM:වා #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC:වා #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:වාත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:වාත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+FN:වායි  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:වායි  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:වෙක් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+FN:වෙකි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+CJ:වෙකුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:වෙකුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+VOC:වෝ #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM:වෝ  #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+CJ:වෝත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+FN:වෝයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:වෙකු #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:වෙකුයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:වෙකුත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:වකු #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:වකුයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:වකුත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC:න්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:වනුත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:වනුයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:වාට #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:වාටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:වාටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:වෙකුට #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:වෙකුටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:වෙකුටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:වකුට #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:වකුටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:වකුටයි #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT:වන්ට #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:වන්ටත් #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:වන්ටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:වාගෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:වාගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:වාගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:වෙකුගෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:වෙකුගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:වෙකුගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:වකුගෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:වකුගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:වකුගෙනි #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL:වන්ගෙන් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:වන්ගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:වන්ගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:වාගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:වාගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:වාගේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:වගෙ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:වගෙත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:වගෙයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:වෙකුගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:වෙකුගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:වෙකුගේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:වකුගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:වකුගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:වකුගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN:වන්ගේ #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:වන්ගේත් #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:වන්ගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+VOC:වනි  #;

LEXICON NounMascBackVowelStem   
අතදරු	NounMascBackVowel;
අපනයනකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
අප්‍රිකානු	NounMascBackVowel;
අයදුම්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
අයිතිකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
අලුකුත්තේරු	NounMascBackVowel;
අලුගෝසු	NounMascBackVowel;
අස්ගොව්	NounMascBackVowel;
ආනයනකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ආසියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඇන්ගෝලියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඇපකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඇමෙරිකානු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඇෆ්ගනිස්තානු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඉතියෝපියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඉන්ජිනේරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඉන්දුනීසියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
උඩැක්කිකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
උදව්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
උරුමකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
උරුලෑ	NounMascBackVowel;
එළු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඔට්ටුකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඔත්තුකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කකුළු	NounMascBackVowel;
කථාකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කම්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කරත්තකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කළමනාකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ක්‍රිස්තියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
කැමරාකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කැස්බෑ	NounMascBackVowel;
කියුබානු	NounMascBackVowel;
කුමරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කුලදරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කුහුඹු	NounMascBackVowel;
කෙන්යානු	NounMascBackVowel;
කොල්ලකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කොළු	NounMascBackVowel;
ගැනුම්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ගොළු	NounMascBackVowel;
ජනමාධ්‍යකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ජැමෙයිකානු	NounMascBackVowel;
තකතීරු	NounMascBackVowel;
තරඟකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
තැන්පත්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
තැරැව්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
දළඹු	NounMascBackVowel;
දූදරු	NounMascBackVowel;
දේවතා	NounMascBackVowel;
නළදරු	NounMascBackVowel;
නාට්‍යකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
නියමු	NounMascBackVowel;
නොදරු	NounMascBackVowel;
පකිස්තානු	NounMascBackVowel;
පදිංචිකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
පිළිහුඩු	NounMascBackVowel;
පුහුණුකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
පෙරකදෝරු	NounMascBackVowel;
බැටළු	NounMascBackVowel;
බූරු	NounMascBackVowel;
මකුළු	NounMascBackVowel;
මරු	NounMascBackVowel;
මැලේසියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
මිනීමරු	NounMascBackVowel;
යහළු	NounMascBackVowel;
යුදෙව්	NounMascBackVowel;
රණවිරු	NounMascBackVowel;
රුසියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
ලිබියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
වටු	NounMascBackVowel;
වන්දනාකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
වාර්තාකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
විත්තිකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
විනිසුරු	NounMascBackVowel;
විරෝධතාකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ශුභාරංචිකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
සයිකල්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ස්ලොවැකියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
සාහිත්‍යකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
සැපයුම්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
සිත්තම්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
සිනමාකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
සිව්පා	NounMascBackVowel;
සිසුදරු	NounMascBackVowel;
සුක්කානම්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
සොල්දාදු	NounMascBackVowel;
හවුල්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
හාමුදුරු	NounMascBackVowel;
හිමිකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
හීරළු	NounMascBackVowel;
හොරදෙටු	NounMascBackVowel;
ළදරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කිසි‍	NounMascBackVowel;
නැකැත්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
පර්සියානූ	NounMascBackVowel;
බිහිවේ	NounMascBackVowel;
මෙි	NounMascBackVowel;
රථකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
අගසව්	NounMascBackVowel;
අඟුළු	NounMascBackVowel;
අත්දුටු	NounMascBackVowel;
අත්හිටවු	NounMascBackVowel;
අනුගතවන	NounMascBackVowel;
අයදින	NounMascBackVowel;
අවුළුවන	NounMascBackVowel;
ආරම්භකපිතිකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඇතිනොවේ	NounMascBackVowel;
ඇදබාන	NounMascBackVowel;
ඇඳගන්න	NounMascBackVowel;
ඇමැතිවූ	NounMascBackVowel;
ඇවිස්සෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
ඈඳෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
ඉඩහරින	NounMascBackVowel;
ඉතිහාසකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඉඳිවෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
ඉපැයු	NounMascBackVowel;
උතුරායන	NounMascBackVowel;
උනහපුලු	NounMascBackVowel;
එරෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
එල්ලවු	NounMascBackVowel;
එළන	NounMascBackVowel;
එළිදැක්	NounMascBackVowel;
ඔටෝ	NounMascBackVowel;
ඔහුද	NounMascBackVowel;
කඩවන	NounMascBackVowel;
කතාකෙරෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
කනගාටුවන	NounMascBackVowel;
කරතිබෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
කළජාවාරම්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කැඳවු	NounMascBackVowel;
කෑගසන	NounMascBackVowel;
කියවපු	NounMascBackVowel;
කියව්	NounMascBackVowel;
කියැවෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
කෙළෙසෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
ගම්වදින	NounMascBackVowel;
ගහපු	NounMascBackVowel;
ගැයු	NounMascBackVowel;
ගැලවු	NounMascBackVowel;
ගැළැපෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
ගෙණ	NounMascBackVowel;
චෝදනාකරන	NounMascBackVowel;
ජන්තු	NounMascBackVowel;
තබෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
තැවරෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
තිපෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
ති‍බෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
තියපු	NounMascBackVowel;
තුඩුදෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
දක්ෂවූ	NounMascBackVowel;
දළුලන	NounMascBackVowel;
දියවෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
දිරිදෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
දිස්නොවන	NounMascBackVowel;
දුරුකර	NounMascBackVowel;
දොවන	NounMascBackVowel;
නඑ	NounMascBackVowel;
නම්වූ	NounMascBackVowel;
නායයන	NounMascBackVowel;
නැරඹු	NounMascBackVowel;
නිකුත්වෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
නිරුද්ධවන	NounMascBackVowel;
නූ	NounMascBackVowel;
නොතේරෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
නොදන්	NounMascBackVowel;
නොපත්	NounMascBackVowel;
නොසිදුවන	NounMascBackVowel;
පටලන	NounMascBackVowel;
පණගැන්වෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
පලදරන	NounMascBackVowel;
පළකෙරෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
පාඩුලබන	NounMascBackVowel;
පාවිච්චිකරන	NounMascBackVowel;
පැටවෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
පැවත්වූ	NounMascBackVowel;
පැහැදෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
පෑදේ	NounMascBackVowel;
පෑහෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
පිටුදකින	NounMascBackVowel;
පිටෝ	NounMascBackVowel;
පින්සිදුවන	NounMascBackVowel;
පියනඟන	NounMascBackVowel;
පිලිප්පු	NounMascBackVowel;
පිළිබිඹුවන	NounMascBackVowel;
පිිහිටු	NounMascBackVowel;
පුපුරවන	NounMascBackVowel;
පූදින	NounMascBackVowel;
පෙවු	NounMascBackVowel;
පොරකන	NounMascBackVowel;
ප්‍රදේශයක්වූ	NounMascBackVowel;
බබලවන	NounMascBackVowel;
බලනන	NounMascBackVowel;
බාබේරියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
බැරිවන	NounMascBackVowel;
බිඳන	NounMascBackVowel;
බිහිනොවන	NounMascBackVowel;
බෙත්	NounMascBackVowel;
මඟපෙන්වූ	NounMascBackVowel;
මතුකෙරෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
මරලාදාන	NounMascBackVowel;
මළදරු	NounMascBackVowel;
මාසිතන	NounMascBackVowel;
මැඩපැවැත්	NounMascBackVowel;
මිහිදන්වූ	NounMascBackVowel;
මොලකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
මෝරන	NounMascBackVowel;
යටත්වෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
යාවෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
රඟදැක්වූ	NounMascBackVowel;
රජකරන	NounMascBackVowel;
රම්ලි	NounMascBackVowel;
රැවැට්ටු	NounMascBackVowel;
ලඟාවන	NounMascBackVowel;
ලෙළදෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
වදාරණ	NounMascBackVowel;
වස්සවන	NounMascBackVowel;
වාඩිවන	NounMascBackVowel;
වාසනාවේ	NounMascBackVowel;
වැජඹේ	NounMascBackVowel;
වැද්දුම්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
වැසීයන	NounMascBackVowel;
වැළදෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
වැළෙඳන	NounMascBackVowel;
වියෝවූ	NounMascBackVowel;
විශ්වාසකරන	NounMascBackVowel;
විසඳගන්න	NounMascBackVowel;
විහිදවූ	NounMascBackVowel;
වේළු	NounMascBackVowel;
සංවර්ධනයමේ	NounMascBackVowel;
සබැඳෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
සහභාගිකර	NounMascBackVowel;
සැනසු	NounMascBackVowel;
සිටවු	NounMascBackVowel;
සිත්තම්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
සිසිලියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
සුදිලේ	NounMascBackVowel;
සුවවෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
සෙලවෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
සේ්	NounMascBackVowel;
සොලවන	NounMascBackVowel;
ස්තූතිකරන	NounMascBackVowel;
හඬනඟන	NounMascBackVowel;
හසුරැ	NounMascBackVowel;
හැසිරෙව්	NounMascBackVowel;
හෙළිදරව්වන	NounMascBackVowel;
කැමරාකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
මැදිහත්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
පණිවිඩකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
සොල්දාදු	NounMascBackVowel;
යහලු	NounMascBackVowel;
මිනීමරු	NounMascBackVowel;
මංකොල්ලකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
අන්කිසි	NounMascBackVowel;
කලමණාකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
චිත්‍රකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
පරදින	NounMascBackVowel;
පෙරකදෝරු	NounMascBackVowel;
මෙහෙයුම්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
යහළු	NounMascBackVowel;
වරෙන්තුකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
බෝම්බකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
පිළිගැන්වූ	NounMascBackVowel;
දළඹු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඇබ්බැහිවූ	NounMascBackVowel;
ගතවූ	NounMascBackVowel;
ඉන්දියානු	NounMascBackVowel;
දැරූ	NounMascBackVowel;
කුහුඹු	NounMascBackVowel;
ගණුදෙනුකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
අස්වෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
නැරැඹු	NounMascBackVowel;
හසුවූ	NounMascBackVowel;
අප්‍රිකානු	NounMascBackVowel;
යාළු	NounMascBackVowel;
ඉයුකැරියෝටා	NounMascBackVowel;
ලිපිකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ආදිසිසු	NounMascBackVowel;
ගැස්සෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
සැලසේ	NounMascBackVowel;
ටා	NounMascBackVowel;
සිසු	NounMascBackVowel;
අපනයනකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
අඩුකරන	NounMascBackVowel;
ගැලවෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
බැලූ	NounMascBackVowel;
කොන්ත්‍රාත්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
ගිර	NounMascBackVowel;
විත්තිකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
අරින	NounMascBackVowel;
පිරෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
ගොළු	NounMascBackVowel;
සාක්කිකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කළසැකකරු	NounMascBackVowel;
විසු	NounMascBackVowel;
කැඳවුම්කරු	NounMascBackVowel;
කැඩෙන	NounMascBackVowel;
